Washington statutes.
RCW 18.43.050

Application—Registration fees.

Application for registration shall be on forms prescribed by the board and furnished by the director, shall contain statements made under oath, showing the applicant's education and detail summary of his or her technical work and shall contain verification of the technical work from professional engineers that supervised the applicant's technical work and have personal knowledge of the applicant's engineering experience.

The registration fee for professional engineers shall be determined by the board, which shall accompany the application and shall include the cost of examination and issuance of certificate. The fee for engineer-in-training shall be determined by the board, which shall accompany the application and shall include the cost of examination and issuance of certificate.

The registration fee for professional land surveyors shall be determined by the board, which shall accompany the application and shall include the cost of examination and issuance of certificate. The fee for land-surveyor-in-training shall be determined by the board, which shall accompany the application and shall include the cost of examination and issuance of certificate.

Should the board find an applicant ineligible for registration, the registration fee shall be retained as an application fee.

[ 2019 c 442 s 5; 1995 c 356 s 3; 1991 c 19 s 3; 1985 c 7 s 42; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 46; 1947 c 283 s 8; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8306-25. Prior: 1935 c 167 s 6; RRS s 8306-6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 356: See note following RCW 18.43.020.